






Ul-Vi













Home
Company Histories
 Ul-Vi


		       Ul-Vi
		    
Ultra Petroleum Corporation Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Ultra Petroleum Corporation

Unibanco Holdings S.A. Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Unibanco Holdings S.A.

Union Carbide Corporation Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Union Carbide Corporation

United Dairy Farmers, Inc. Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on United Dairy Farmers, Inc.

United Online, Inc. Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on United Online, Inc.

United Press International, Inc. Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on United Press International, Inc.

Uno Restaurant Holdings Corporation Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Uno Restaurant Holdings Corporation

Unocal Corporation Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Unocal Corporation

Urban Outfitters, Inc. Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Urban Outfitters, Inc.

Utz Quality Foods, Inc. Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Utz Quality Foods, Inc.

Valero Energy Corporation Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Valero Energy Corporation

Value Line, Inc. Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Value Line, Inc.

Vanguard Health Systems Inc. Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Vanguard Health Systems Inc.

Variety Wholesalers, Inc. Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Variety Wholesalers, Inc.

Vauxhall Motors Limited Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Vauxhall Motors Limited

Velcro Industries N.V. Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Velcro Industries N.V.

Verbatim Corporation Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Verbatim Corporation

Verint Systems Inc. Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Verint Systems Inc.

Vestas Wind Systems A/S Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Vestas Wind Systems A/S

Viad Corp. Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Viad Corp.

Vicat S.A. Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Vicat S.A.

Victorinox AG Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Victorinox AG

ViewSonic Corporation Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on ViewSonic Corporation

Vilmorin Clause et Cie Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Vilmorin Clause et Cie
Public Company
Incorporated: 1998 as Vilmorin Clause & Cie.

Virbac Corporation Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Virbac Corporation
Public Company
Incorporated: 1987 as Virbac Inc.














Valero Energy Corp (VLO.N)  Company Profile | Reuters.com


























































X



Edition:

United States


















Africa
América Latina


عربي
Argentina


Brasil
Canada


中国
Deutschland


España
France


India
Italia


日本
México


РОССИЯ
United Kingdom

United States
















Profile: Valero Energy Corp (VLO.N)





Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerEnergyOil & Gas Refining and Marketing












                
                        Overview
                    



                
                        News
                    



                
                        Key Developments
                    



                
                        People
                    



                
                        Charts
                    



                
                        Financials
                    



                
                        Analysts
                    



                    
                            Research
                        



                    
                            Pulse
                        










				VLO.N on New York Stock Exchange


				68.48USD
10:33am EDT





				    Change	(% chg)


		    
						    $-0.02


					            (-0.03%)
					        






Prev Close

$68.50


Open

$68.19




Day's High

$68.62


Day's Low

$68.08




Volume

148,929


Avg. Vol

1,113,271




52-wk High

$71.40


52-wk Low

$51.18












					Full Description



Valero Energy Corporation (Valero), incorporated on June 8, 1981, is an independent petroleum refiner and ethanol producer. The Company's segments include refining, ethanol and Valero Energy Partners LP (VLP). The refining segment includes its refining operations and the associated marketing activities. The ethanol segment includes its ethanol operations and the associated marketing activities, and logistics assets that support its ethanol operations. The Company owns logistics assets (crude oil pipelines, refined petroleum product pipelines, terminals, tanks, marine docks, truck rack bays and other assets) that support its refining operations. Some of these assets are owned by VLP, which is a midstream master limited partnership owned by the Company. VLP's assets include crude oil and refined petroleum products pipeline and terminal systems in the United States Gulf Coast and the United States Mid-Continent regions. The Company's refineries produce conventional gasolines, premium gasolines, gasoline meeting the specifications of the California Air Resources Board (CARB), diesel, low-sulfur diesel, ultra-low-sulfur diesel, CARB diesel, other distillates, jet fuel, asphalt, petrochemicals, lubricants and other refined petroleum products.RefiningAs of December 31, 2016, the Company owned 15 petroleum refineries located in the United States, Canada and the United Kingdom with a combined throughput capacity of approximately 3.1 million barrels per day. The Company sells its refined petroleum products in both the wholesale rack and bulk markets. These sales include refined petroleum products that are manufactured in its refining operations, as well as refined petroleum products purchased or received on exchange from third parties. As of December 31, 2016, the Company also sold its refined petroleum products in approximately 7,400 outlets under its brand names in the United States, Canada, the United Kingdom and Ireland. The Company's refineries have access to marine transportation facilities and interconnect with common-carrier pipeline systems, enabling the Company to sell products in the United States, Canada, the United Kingdom and other countries.The Company sells branded and unbranded gasoline and distillate production, as well as other products, such as asphalt, lube oils, and natural gas liquids (NGLs). The principal purchasers of its refined petroleum products from terminal truck racks are wholesalers, distributors, retailers, and truck-delivered end users throughout the United States, Canada, the United Kingdom and Ireland. The majority of its rack volume is sold through unbranded channels. The remainder is sold to distributors and dealers that are members of the Valero-brand family. As of December 31, 2016, the Company had approximately 5,700 branded sites in the United States, approximately 900 branded sites in the United Kingdom and Ireland, and approximately 800 branded sites in Canada. These sites are independently owned and are supplied by the Company under multi-year contracts. For branded sites, products are sold under the Valero, Beacon, Diamond Shamrock and Shamrock brands in the United States; the Texaco brand in the United Kingdom and Ireland, and the Ultramar brand in Canada.The Company sells its gasoline and distillate production, as well as other products, such as asphalt, petrochemicals and NGLs, through bulk sales channels in the United States and international markets. Its bulk sales are made to various oil companies and traders, as well as certain bulk end users, such as railroads, airlines, and utilities. Its bulk sales are transported primarily by pipeline, barges, and tankers to major tank farms and trading hubs.EthanolAs of December 31, 2016, the Company owned 11 ethanol plants in the Mid-Continent region of the United States with a combined production capacity of approximately 1.4 billion gallons per year. It sells ethanol in the wholesale bulk market, and some of its logistics assets supporting its ethanol operations. The Company sources its corn supply from local farmers and commercial elevators. The Company sells its ethanol primarily to refiners and gasoline blenders under term and spot contracts in bulk markets, such as New York, Chicago, the United States Gulf Coast, Florida, and the United States West Coast. The Company ships its dry distillers grains by truck or rail primarily to animal feed customers in the United States and Mexico. It also sells modified distillers grains locally at its plant sites, and corn oil by truck or rail. The Company distributes its ethanol through logistics assets, which include railcars owned by it.

» Full Overview of VLO.N







					Company Address



Valero Energy Corp
530 McCullough AveSAN ANTONIO   TX   78215-2104
P: +1210.2462000F: +1302.6555049







					Company Web Links



Home Page








					Officers & Directors






Name
Compensation




							 Joseph Gorder

18,452,600




							 Michael Ciskowski

8,214,620




							 Jay Browning

4,052,470




							 R. Lane Riggs

4,835,500




							 Gary Simmons

3,202,930




» More Officers & Directors





					Valero Energy Corp News




DIARY-U.S. refinery operations-Shell to shutter Convent gasoline unit in early '18

Jul 27 2017 
Refiner Valero posts higher-than-expected quarterly profit

Jul 27 2017 
UPDATE 1-Refiner Valero posts higher-than-expected quarterly profit

Jul 27 2017 
BRIEF-Valero Energy reports Q2 earnings per share $1.23

Jul 27 2017 
Refiner Valero's quarterly profit slumps 32.7 pct

Jul 27 2017 


» More VLO.N  News
















Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerEnergyOil & Gas Refining and Marketing



























Valero Energy Corporation Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Valero Energy Corporation













Home
Company Histories
 Ul-Vi
 Valero Energy Corporation Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Valero Energy Corporation






      Valero Energy Corporation
    











        One Valero Way
        
        San Antonio, Texas 78249-1112
        
        U.S.A.
        
        Telephone: (210) 246-2000
        
        Toll Free: (800) 531-7911
        
        Fax: (210) 246-2646
        
        Web site: 
        
          http://www.valero.com
        




        Public Company
      


        Incorporated:
      
       1980
      

        Employees:
      
       19,797
      

        Sales:
      
       $54.62 billion (2004)
      

        Stock Exchanges:
      
       New York
      

        Ticker Symbol:
      
       VLO
      

        NAIC:
      
       324110 Petroleum Refineries; 422710 Petroleum Bulk Stations and
      Terminals; 424720 Petroleum and Petroleum Products Merchant Wholesalers
      (Except Bulk Stations and Terminals); 447110 Gasoline Stations with
      Convenience Stores; 447190 Other Gasoline Stations; 454311 Heating Oil
      Dealers
    

      Valero Energy Corporation is the leading independent oil refiner in the
      United States. The company owns and operates 15 refineries with a combined
      capacity of 2.5 million barrels per day. About 60 percent of this capacity
      is in the Gulf Coast region through refineries in Texas, Louisiana, and
      Aruba. The remaining refineries are on the West Coast, the Mid-Continent
      region, and in the Northeast. Valero also markets refined products on a
      wholesale basis through a bulk and rack marketing network and via more
      than 4,700 retail sites branded as Valero, Diamond Shamrock, Ultramar,
      Beacon, and Total. About 1,500 of the retail sites are company-operated
      outlets combining a fuel station with a convenience store. Valero's
      marketing reach extends to 40 U.S. states, Canada, Latin America, and the
      Caribbean region. The company also owns a 46 percent interest in Valero
      L.P., a publicly traded limited partnership that owns and operates crude
      oil and refined product pipelines, refined product terminals, and crude
      oil storage facilities mainly located in Texas, Oklahoma, New Mexico,
      Colorado, and California.
    

      Valero Energy was founded as a natural gas pipeline on the first day of
      1980. In an effort to diversify itself into a broad-based energy firm, the
      company purchased a petroleum refinery shortly after its inception.
      Renovation and start-up of this facility in a difficult world petroleum
      market nearly put Valero out of business. The company subsequently sold
      off its natural gas properties to a limited partnership to retain
      financial stability and concentrate on its refining activities. Conditions
      in the petroleum industry repaid this gamble, and Valero Energy thrived in
      the late 1980s and early 1990s. From there, the Valero of the early 21st
      century was largely engineered through acquisitions. From 1997 to 2004 the
      company acquired 14 of the 15 refineries it now operates. The biggest of
      these deals came in December 2001 when Valero bought Ultramar Diamond
      Shamrock Corporation for about $6 billion in cash, stock, and assumed
      debt, thereby gaining six refineries and vastly enlarging its retail
      operations.
    


        Gas Gathering Pipeline Beginnings
        
         As Coastal States Spinoff
      


      The company was created by the Texas Railroad Commission, the
      state's energy-regulating authority, to rectify the misdeeds of the
      Lo-Vaca Gathering Company, one subsidiary of the Coastal States Gas
      Corporation, Valero's corporate precursor. In the 1960s
      Coastal's chairman, Oscar S. Wyatt, Jr., had signed contracts to
      deliver gas to many customers, including several large Texas cities, at
      low prices, with the expectation that costs for gas would not rise. By
      1972 and 1973, however, gas prices had risen dramatically, and the company
      was not able to fulfill its contracts. The Texas regulatory board allowed
      Coastal to pass on its higher prices to customers and to make a small
      profit, rather than see the company go out of business. The question of
      the penalty for Coastal's broken contracts became a matter of
      litigation that stretched through the mid-1970s.
    

      Finally, in December 1977, the commission ruled that Coastal would have to
      refund $1.6 billion—more than the company was worth—to its
      customers. To satisfy this ruling, Coastal's intrastate Texas
      gas-gathering pipeline was spun off into a new company, Valero. Former
      Coastal customers were awarded 55 percent of the new company's
      equity, while the other half went to Coastal's shareholders, with
      the exception of Wyatt. In addition, 
       Coastal was ordered to spend $230 million exploring for new gas over the
      next decade and a half. Any new gas found would be sold to Valero at a
      rate 15 percent below the current market price. Valero also got a $110
      million chunk of Coastal stock.
    

      Thus, at its birth, Valero became the largest intrastate pipeline in
      Texas, with 8,000 miles of transmission lines, assets worth $700 million,
      and start-up revenues exceeding $1 billion. In addition, Valero had the
      right to charge customers ten cents per million cubic feet (mcf) over its
      cost of gas in its first year, and 15 cents over mcf in its second,
      guaranteeing the company a profit of at least $23 million. Valero's
      stock was slated to be listed on the New York Stock Exchange shortly after
      its formal inaugural.
    

      To separate itself from its corporate parent, Valero chose to locate its
      headquarters in San Antonio. The city was both the company's
      largest customer and an outpost 200 miles from Coastal's Houston
      home. The company's name was taken from the Mission of San Antonio
      de Valero, the original name of the Alamo. As its president, the company
      chose Bill Greehey, formerly the court-appointed head of Lo-Vaca. Greehey
      had been instrumental in negotiating the out-of-court settlement that
      resulted in Valero's formation.
    

      Beyond Valero's basic gas business, Greehey planned to expand into
      gas storage and oil and gas exploration, as well as coal and oil refining.
      He planned to make Valero a "fully integrated energy
      company," as he told a 
      
        Fortune
      
       correspondent in January 1980.
    

      In its first year of existence, Valero moved quickly to solidify its
      position and expand into the nonregulated areas of its industry. The
      company tapped into new supplies of gas, signing contracts in Mexico and
      Texas, and also added new storage facilities. Announcing that it would
      spend $14 million expanding its production of natural gas
      liquids—which at the time were selling at high prices—the
      company planned to build a $10.2 million processing facility and construct
      a 25-mile pipeline. Valero also spent $4 million on tentative moves into
      the gas exploration and drilling business.
    


        First Move into Refining, Early 1980s
      


      Valero made its most significant investment late in 1980 when it bought a
      one-half interest in Saber Energy, Inc., a small marketer of gasoline, for
      $51 million. With its new partner, Valero planned to turn Saber's
      tiny gasoline-producing operation in Corpus Christi, Texas, into a
      state-of-the-art specialized refinery. The facility was designed to use
      the product at the bottom of a barrel of crude oil—a high-sulfur,
      tar-like substance known as atmospheric residual oil (abbreviated
      "resid")—as its raw material, or
      "feedstock." Resid was obtained as a byproduct of the
      processing of raw crude oil and generally cost significantly less than a
      barrel of crude, which was the feedstock of a conventional refinery. By
      cracking resid in a complicated and expensive process, Saber's
      refinery would create high-quality gasoline. In the Saber partnership, the
      company made its bid to become a broad-based energy concern.
    

      In 1981 Valero embarked on the construction of the new refining facility,
      which was slated to cost $100 million. In addition, the company revamped
      its somewhat ineffective exploration and production operation, moving
      aggressively to get underway and opening regional offices in Midland and
      Houston, Texas; Denver, Colorado; and New Orleans, Louisiana. By the end
      of the fiscal year, Valero's net income had risen to $97.3 million,
      an increase of more than 50 percent from the previous year.
    

      By 1983 Texas was in the grip of a severe recession, and Valero's
      outlook was growing less rosy. The company's earnings from its core
      businesses—gas sales and transportation of other people's
      gas through Valero's pipelines—went into decline. In an
      effort to counteract losses, Valero joined in industry efforts to
      encourage the shipment of gas directly to large commercial customers,
      which helped somewhat to prop up its earnings.
    

      In its new endeavors, Valero had mixed success. Although the company had
      spent $100 million on exploration, it had yet to benefit from these
      efforts. Valero's natural gas liquids business, however, proved
      prosperous. The company had increased its gas liquids capabilities by 50
      percent, building eight plants at a cost of $150 million to stockpile
      ethane, butane, and propane, and these facilities contributed
      significantly to Valero's profits. "If not for gas
      liquids," Greehey told 
      
        Business Week
      
       in 1983, "we would have been in trouble."
    


        Mid-1980s Travails
      


      The biggest problem proved to be Valero's large investment in the
      Saber gasoline refinery. Two years into the project, estimated costs had
      reached $617 million, the most ever spent per barrel of oil on a refinery.
      Valero had taken on $550 million in debt to finance construction, and by
      1983 the project was behind schedule. Experiencing difficulties meeting
      federal air pollution standards, the company was forced repeatedly to
      postpone full start-up of the facility. In addition, the economics of the
      refinery had shifted significantly since the project's inception.
      When Valero had started out, resid had been very cheap, while gasoline,
      the refined product, had been selling at a relatively high price. This
      justified large expenditures to convert one into the other. By 1983,
      however, the cost of Valero's raw materials had risen, and an
      oversupply of gasoline had driven prices for its end product down,
      dramatically reducing the potential profitability of the refinery.
    

      The cost of raw materials for Valero's refinery was driven up
      further in 1984 when Great Britain suffered a coal strike. Unable to use
      coal as a fuel, British industry turned to resid instead, driving the
      demand and the cost of Valero's feedstock to unexpected heights,
      which at times exceeded the cost of straight crude oil. As a result of
      this stroke of bad luck, Valero's Saber refinery had still not
      become profitable by the middle of 1984.
    


        Company Perspectives:
      


          Valero is a premier refining and marketing company that leads in
          shareholder value growth through innovative, efficient upgrading of
          low-cost feedstocks into high-value, high-quality products.
        



      Valero had certified to its lenders that the refinery was up and running
      two months after it had originally planned, but even after this step was
      taken, low gasoline prices meant that the 
       plant was operating at a loss. In August 1984 heavy trading of
      Valero's stock prompted speculation that the company would be the
      target of a takeover.
    

      Saber posted losses of $53 million in the first half of 1984, and by that
      fall, its rapidly weakening financial condition had obligated Valero to
      buy out its partner. In doing so, Valero added Saber's substantial
      debts to its own large tally of borrowed funds, doubling its overall level
      of long-term indebtedness. As a result, the company was forced to omit a
      dividend to its shareholders in the quarter in which the consolidation was
      made. To placate its worried bankers, Valero agreed to limit its spending
      on other areas of its business while it postponed payments to the bank on
      its loans. With this news, the price of the company's stock sank to
      its lowest point, as investors anticipated the company's possible
      bankruptcy.
    

      In an effort to shore up its financial condition, in February 1985, Valero
      entered into an agreement with Techniques d'Avant Garde Group SA,
      known as TAG, a holding company controlled by Saudi Arabian Akkram Ojjeh.
      TAG invested $15 million in Valero as part of an agreement that the Saudi
      investor would raise its interest in the company to one-third if Valero
      could locate a cheap source of raw materials for its refinery. In a second
      bid to raise funds, Valero sold off a 50 percent interest in its West
      Texas pipeline system to InterNorth, an energy company based in Omaha,
      Nebraska. The sale brought the financially beleaguered company $68
      million.
    

      By late spring of 1985, more favorable conditions in the energy industry
      as a whole had begun to lift Valero's prospects. As costs for crude
      oil byproducts fell and the price of gasoline rose, the Saber refinery was
      able to increase its earnings, posting a small operating profit for March.
      Despite this good news, the company temporarily suspended its production
      of gasoline at the Saber facility, resuming operations in June. The
      following month, Valero's agreement with TAG, the Saudi investor,
      was called off. At the end of 1985 Valero reported losses of $16.1
      million.
    

      By early 1986 Valero was also suffering from a glut in its original field,
      natural gas. Unable to sell the gas it had contracted at its founding in
      1979 to buy from its corporate parent, Coastal, Valero refused to fulfill
      its contracts and in January, was sued by Coastal for $243 million in the
      first of a number of "take-or-pay" suits over gas purchase
      agreements that would not be resolved until the end of the decade.
    

      In an effort to strengthen its financial position, Valero restructured
      $700 million of its debt in April 1986 and got out of the coal business by
      selling off the mine it owned in Indiana. Unable to make its expensive
      Saber refinery profitable given conditions in the world oil market, Valero
      began to informally hunt for a buyer for the facility. Despite the drain
      on funds by the unprofitable refinery, however, improved performance in
      Valero's pipeline operations enabled the company to finish the year
      in the black, posting profits of $34.7 million.
    


        Restructuring and Turnaround in the Late 1980s
      


      Faced with the problem of a profitable gas business that was carrying a
      money-losing refinery, Valero significantly restructured itself in early
      1987. The company spun off its natural gas pipeline and natural gas
      liquids businesses into a limited partnership, Valero Natural Gas
      Partners, L.P., in which it would hold a 49 percent share. For this
      portion, Valero turned over $184 million of its own money, as well as $191
      million contributed by public equity investors. The remainder of the gas
      partnership's funding was raised through the issuance of $550
      million in notes. In addition to these moves, Valero abandoned its
      attempts to find oil and gas reserves, shutting down its exploration
      activities.
    

      With the money from the divestiture of its gas assets, Valero was able to
      reduce its dangerously crippling debt load by more than $700 million,
      restoring its balance sheet to relative health. This meant, however, that
      the core of the company was its money-losing refinery. Valero lost $13.3
      million in the first six months of 1987 on its refining and gasoline
      marketing activities.
    


        Key Dates:
      



            1980:
          


          Valero Energy Corporation is formed as a spinoff of Coastal States Gas
          Corporation, specifically Coastal's intrastate Texas
          gas-gathering pipeline; based in San Antonio, Valero moves into
          refining by acquiring an interest in Saber Energy, Inc., which
          operates a small refinery in Corpus Christi, Texas.
        


            1981:
          


          Valero begins a massive expansion of the Corpus Christi facility into
          a state-of-the-art refinery.
        


            1984:
          


          The expanded Corpus Christi refinery is up and running.
        


            1987:
          


          Valero spins off its natural gas pipeline and natural gas liquids
          business into Valero Natural Gas Partners, L.P., in which it holds a
          49 percent share; company shuts down its exploration activities.
        


            1994:
          


          Company buys the 51 percent of Valero Natural Gas Partners it does not
          already own.
        


            1997:
          


          Valero divests its natural gas business in a deal with PG&E
          valued at $1.5 billion; company acquires Basis Petroleum, Inc. and its
          three Gulf Coast refineries.
        


            1998:
          


          Refinery in Paulsboro, New Jersey, is purchased from Mobil
          Corporation.
        


            2000:
          


          Valero buys a refinery in Benicia, California, from Exxon Mobil
          Corporation, along with 350 gasoline stations—marking the
          firm's entry into retailing.
        


            2001:
          


          Ultramar Diamond Shamrock Corporation is acquired in a $6.1 billion
          deal.
        


            2003:
          


          A refinery in St. Charles Parish, Louisiana, is purchased from Orion
          Refining Corporation.
        


            2004:
          


          Valero acquires El Paso Corporation's Aruba refinery.
        


            2005:
          


          Valero announces a definitive agreement to acquire Premcor Inc. for
          $6.9 billion in cash and stock.
        



      By 1988, however, the climate for petroleum refining had improved, and
      Valero began to see a turnaround in its fortunes. Lower prices for its raw
      materials, coupled with reduced gasoline inventories and growing customer
      demand, enabled the company to turn a profit of $13.2 million in the first
      half of the year. Noting that the recent turmoil in the oil and gas
      industry had put many refineries out of business, Valero's leaders
      were confident that domestic demand for gasoline would continue to exceed
      refining capacity, keeping prices high. In addition, the 
       company counted on the fact that the product it refined was high-quality,
      high-octane, clean-burning unleaded gas, for which it anticipated a
      growing demand.
    

      On the supply side, Valero noted that prices for resid had fallen as
      stockpiles had grown, and the company moved to upgrade its refinery,
      increasing capacity. To assure future steady supplies of raw materials,
      the company sought to take on a foreign petroleum producer as a joint
      owner in the refinery. Valero ended 1988 with $30.6 million in posted
      profits.
    

      The company's fortunes continued to improve in the following year.
      Valero's half-owned natural gas operations had profited from the
      deregulation of the gas industry; it increased its sales by adding
      customers outside Texas. The company was able to transport, through
      interstate gas pipeline linkups, and sell gas to clients in other states
      and in Mexico. Its number of gas processing plants had grown to 11.
    

      Valero also continued to upgrade its oil-refining facilities. The company
      added a device that enhanced the octane level of the gas it produced and
      also constructed a natural gas processing plant that split the gas into
      products to be used in petrochemicals or oil refining activities. In 1989
      Valero announced that it would own a 20 percent stake in a planned $104
      million plant for processing gases given off in the refining process in
      Corpus Christi, Texas. These measures, along with the reduction in
      Valero's debt load, allowed the company to reduce its break-even
      point for a barrel of refined oil from $6.00, when the plant had started
      up, to $3.60 in 1989. As a result of refinery upgrades and the
      strengthened market, Valero was able to restore its dividend payment in a
      sign of fiscal health in the second quarter of that year. The company
      finished 1989 with profits of $41.5 million.
    


        Continuing Recovery in the Early 1990s
      


      Valero's recovery from the severe difficulties it had experienced
      in the mid-1980s continued as the company moved into the 1990s. The world
      oil industry was thrown into turmoil in August 1990 when Iraq invaded
      major oil producer Kuwait, driving up the prices of both crude oil and
      refined petroleum products. With this increased activity, Valero
      contracted for an additional $200 million investment in its refinery
      facilities. The company ended the year with earnings of $94.7 million,
      nearly double those of the year before. In a reversal of earlier
      conditions, petroleum refining accounted for a vast portion of the
      profits, while the company's interest in its natural gas
      partnership contributed only 20 percent of the company's returns.
    

      The launching of the Allied offensive in the Persian Gulf in early 1991
      immediately drove petroleum prices down. In anticipation of this effect,
      however, Valero had sold much of its first quarter production in advance
      at inflated prices and added $30 million to its balance sheet. Although
      Valero lost money when it was forced to shut down part of its production
      to make improvements to its plant, the company completed 1991 with record
      profits of $98.7 million.
    

      Looking to profit from the general move toward more environmentally
      conscious, cleaner-burning fuels, such as natural gas and the high-octane
      products refined at its Corpus Christi facility, Valero continued to
      upgrade its plants in 1992. In addition, the company expected that by 1994
      their entire gasoline output would be made up of reformulated gasoline.
      With an eye to further expansion, the company solidified its balance sheet
      by repurchasing the outstanding shares of an old stock offering and sought
      permission to raise money for expansion by issuing new stocks. Valero also
      opened an office in Mexico City, in an effort to enhance its relationship
      with the Mexican government and assist it in its search for clean energy.
    

      In May 1994 the company bought the 51 percent of Valero Natural Gas
      Partners it did not already own for about $117 million. Valero said that
      it wanted to expanded the natural gas business, but that the limited
      partnership structure inhibited growth. Valero soon began seeking a buyer
      for the business, however, an effort that continued into 1996.
    


        Late 1990s: Separation of Natural Gas Operations,
        
         Launch of Refining Acquisition Spree
      


      Late in 1996 Valero officially announced plans to split the company up in
      order to concentrate solely on oil refining and marketing. In mid-1998
      Valero completed a transaction whereby it sold its natural gas business to
      PG&E Corporation for $720 million in stock and the assumption of
      $780 million in debt. The deal was structured such that Valero's
      oil refining and marketing unit was first spun off to existing
      shareholders prior to consummation of the PG&E transaction. This
      spun-off unit retained the Valero Energy Corporation name, and the old
      Valero Energy was then merged into PG&E. The $1.5 billion Valero
      gained thereby was immediately leveraged to begin a massive, multiyear
      acquisition spree that would catapult the company into position as one of
      the largest refiners in the United States.
    

      The first acquisition of this buying binge also occurred in 1997. Valero
      bought the Basis Petroleum, Inc. oil refining unit of Salomon Inc. for
      about $485 million in cash and stock. Basis operated three refineries on
      the U.S. Gulf Coast, two in Texas, in Texas City and Houston, and one in
      Louisiana, in Krotz Springs. The three refineries had a combined capacity
      of 260,000 barrels per day, more than doubling Valero's existing
      output from its original refinery. Although the Basis refineries had been
      operating at a loss for Salomon, this was in a way a positive for Valero:
      The facilities were in need of improvements, giving Valero an opportunity
      to overhaul the refineries just as it had done with the Corpus Christi
      plant. Already in late 1997, the company announced plans to increase
      capacity at all three Basis facilities.
    

      After losing out to fellow San Antonio refining company Tesoro Petroleum
      Corporation in the bidding for a Shell Oil Company refinery in Anacortes,
      Washington, Valero succeeded in a September 1998 deal that saw it acquire
      a Mobil Corporation refinery in Paulsboro, New Jersey. Purchased for about
      $328 million, the refinery was located about 15 miles south of
      Philadelphia on the Delaware River and produced 155,000 barrels per day,
      increasing Valero's refining base by 25 percent. The deal
      geographically diversified Valero's production facilities and
      provided it with entrée into the markets of the Northeast.
    


        A Blockbuster Deal and Blockbuster Earnings
        
         in the Early 2000s
      


      After seeing its bottom line suffer in the late 1990s because of low crude
      oil prices, Valero, along with the rest of the U.S. 
       refining industry, entered a new era of fat profits in the new century.
      Soaring crude oil prices, surging demand for refined products, and
      refineries operating at or near their capacities produced a volatile mix
      leading to higher prices at the pump and soaring net income for the
      refiners. As this new era began, Valero accelerated its strategic spending
      spree, which centered on buying plants for a slim fraction of their
      replacement value.
    

      In 2000 the company gained further geographic diversity by buying Exxon
      Mobil Corporation's refinery in Benicia, California, for $895
      million. The 165,000-barrel-a-day refinery, located near San Francisco,
      was a very good fit for Valero because it could process heavy crude oil
      and nearly 70 percent of its output was cleaner-burning gasoline,
      specifically the reformulated gasoline required by the California Air
      Resources Board. The deal also marked Valero's entry into the
      retailing market as it included about 350 gasoline stations, mainly in
      northern California. Valero envisioned the gasoline retailing business
      providing it with a buffer against the more volatile refining sector. It
      soon debuted the Valero retail brand at some of the acquired stations.
    

      Valero truly catapulted itself into retailing—and into the ranks of
      the major players in the U.S. oil industry—through its unexpected
      acquisition of Ultramar Diamond Shamrock Corporation (UDS) in a deal
      completed on the last day of 2001. The price was shocking for a company
      that just a few years earlier had only one refinery: about $4 billion in
      cash and stock and the assumption of $2.1 billion in debt. Valero gained
      from UDS six refineries with a combined capacity of 682,000 barrels per
      day; they were located in Wilmington, California; Three Rivers and McKee,
      Texas; Ardmore, Oklahoma; Denver, Colorado; and Quebec, Canada. The deal
      also included UDS's nearly 5,000 retail gasoline stations operating
      under such names as Diamond Shamrock, Ultramar, and Beacon. Valero also
      gained control of Shamrock Logistics L.P. (soon renamed Valero L.P.),
      which owned and operated a 3,600-mile network of crude oil and refined
      products pipelines. Valero was now the top independent refiner in the
      United States and one of the leading gasoline retailers as well. With the
      completion of the UDS deal, Valero saw its revenues soar, jumping from
      $14.99 billion in 2001 to $26.98 billion the following year.
    

      To gain regulatory approval for the UDS acquisition, Valero had to sell
      UDS's Golden Eagle refinery located in the San Francisco area along
      with 70 northern California service stations. These assets were sold to
      Tesoro Petroleum in 2002 for $945 million. The integration of UDS into
      Valero was completed without layoffs—a hallmark of the way Greehey
      did business. Even when Greehey sold the natural gas business to
      PG&E, he insisted on extracting a promise from the acquirer that
      none of his former employees would be laid off. Although in each of the
      several huge mergers that rocked the oil industry in the late 1990s and
      early 2000s, thousands of employees had lost their jobs as a result,
      Greehey, according to the 
      
        San Antonio Express-News,
      
       simply said, "That's not the Valero way." The
      company under Greehey's leadership was also well known for its
      generous corporate giving program.
    

      Two more refinery acquisitions followed in the wake of the UDS deal. In
      July 2003 Valero spent about $549 million for a refinery in St. Charles
      Parish, Louisiana, that had daily capacity of 215,000 barrels. Purchased
      from the financially troubled Orion Refining Corporation for 20 percent of
      its replacement cost, this refinery, located adjacent to the Mississippi
      River, was again a perfect fit for Valero in that it could process cheaper
      heavy, sour crude oil while meeting environmental regulations. In March
      2004 Valero bought a 315,000-barrel-per-day refinery located on Aruba from
      El Paso Corporation for $465 million plus about $168 million for working
      capital—a price that represented only about 15 percent of the
      replacement cost. This refinery too was capable of processing heavy, sour
      crude.
    

      Valero's strategy of basing its feedstock largely on sour crude
      oil, which was selling at a large discount to sweet crude oil—the
      discount having averaged more than $11 per barrel in 2004—paid off
      big in 2003 and 2004. After posting profits of $622 million on $37.97
      billion in revenues in the former year, Valero then nearly tripled its
      profits one year later, making $1.8 billion on revenues of $54.62 billion.
      By 2004 the company, every day, was turning two million barrels of crude
      oil into 40 million gallons of gasoline, which amounted to 10 percent of
      the U.S. supply. While there were many skeptics who believed the next oil
      industry bust was right around the corner, Greehey for one remained quite
      optimistic, contending that the conditions that had created the
      boom—high crude oil prices, increasing demand for refined products,
      and refinery utilization at or near capacity—were likely to
      continue. He told the 
      
        San Antonio Express-News
      
       in July 2004, "I think at least for the next four or five years,
      the refining business is going to be absolutely the best business to be
      in." Underscoring this conviction, and catapulting it into the lead
      in domestic crude oil refining, the company inked a deal in May 2005 to
      acquire Premcor Inc. by the end of the year for $3.4 billion in cash and
      $3.5 billion in stock. Valero was likely to pursue additional acquisitions
      of refinery assets as well as increase the capacity of a number of its
      existing refineries in the years to come.
    


        Principal Subsidiaries
      


      Colorado Refining Company; Valero Canada L.P.; Valero Refining and
      Marketing Company; Valero Refining Company—Aruba N.V.; Valero
      Refining Company—California; Valero Refining
      Company—Louisiana; Valero Refining Company—New Jersey;
      Valero Refining—New Orleans, L.L.C.; Valero Refining–Texas
      L.P.
    


        Principal Competitors
      


      BP p.l.c.; Exxon Mobil Corporation; Royal Dutch/Shell Group of Companies;
      ChevronTexaco Corporation; TOTAL S.A.; ConocoPhillips; Marathon Oil
      Corporation; CITGO Petroleum Corporation; Motiva Enterprises LLC; Amerada
      Hess Corporation; Sunoco, Inc.; Tesoro Corporation.
    



          Further Reading
        


        Andrew, John, "Valero Energy Remains a Risky Investment Despite
        Recent Improvements, Analysts Say," 
        
          Wall Street Journal,
        
         April 15, 1985.
      

        Barrionuevo, Alexei, "Tesoro Expands to California in Agreeing to
        Buy Valero Refinery for $945 Million," 
        
          Wall Street Journal,
        
         February 5, 2002, p. B11.
      

        Barrionuevo, Alexei, and Nikhil Deogun, "Valero Agrees to Acquire
        Rival Ultramar," 
        
          Wall Street Journal,
        
         May 7, 2001, p. A3.
      

        "Birth of a Natural-Gas Giant," 
        
          Fortune,
        
         January 14, 1980, pp. 15+.
      

        Culbertson, Katherine, "Valero Plans Balanced Growth As Greehey
        Hands Reins of Firm to New CEO Becraft," 
        
          Oil Daily,
        
         April 1, 1996, pp. SW1, SW6.
      

        Day, Bill, "Valero-UDS Set to Form World's Largest
        Refiner," 
        
          San Antonio Express-News,
        
         May 7, 2001, p. 1A.
      

        ——, "The Valero Way: Under the Leadership of Bill
        Greehey, the Energy Giant Is Going to the Top," 
        
          San Antonio Express-News,
        
         May 13, 2001, p. 1K.
      

        Ewing, Terzah, "Valero Energy Plans to Separate Refining
        Business," 
        
          Wall Street Journal,
        
         November 22, 1996, p. B2.
      

        Fohn, Joe, "Valero Strikes $1.5 Billion Gas Deal," 
        
          San Antonio Express-News,
        
         February 1, 1997, p. 1A.
      

        Gordon, Mitchell, "Free, Fat, and Sassy: Valero Energy Is
        Enjoying Its Independence," 
        
          Barron's,
        
         January 4, 1982, pp. 42+.
      

        Helman, Christopher, "$2 Gas? We Love It," 
        
          Forbes,
        
         June 21, 2004, pp. 72, 77.
      

        Kiernan, Peter, and Paul Merolli, "Valero Makes Surprise $6
        Billion Bid for UDS," 
        
          Oil Daily,
        
         May 8, 2001.
      

        Margolis, Dan, "Valero Chief Forced Out: Founder and Former CEO
        Returns to Lead Restructured Oil Company," 
        
          San Antonio Express-News,
        
         November 22, 1996, p. 1A.
      

        Nazareno, Analisa, "The Valero Way: When Valero Started Buying
        Oil Refineries Two Decades Ago, Critics Hooted. No One's Laughing
        Now," 
        
          San Antonio Express-News,
        
         July 24, 2004, p. 10H.
      

        Poling, Travis E., "Valero to Buy Mobil Unit," 
        
          San Antonio Express-News,
        
         May 22, 1998, p. 1E.
      

        Poole, Claire, "Stubbornness Rewarded," 
        
          Forbes,
        
         April 13, 1992, p. 54.
      

        Reid, Keith, "Valero: The UDS Merger Was Only the Beginning for
        This Ambitious Refiner/Marketer," 
        
          National Petroleum News,
        
         January 2004, pp. 18–19.
      

        Rosenberg, Hilary, "A Rough Time for Valero Energy," 
        
          Financial World,
        
         August 8, 1984, pp. 35+.
      

        Saunders, Barbara, "PG&E to Buy Valero's Natural
        Gas Unit," 
        
          Oil and Gas Journal,
        
         February 10, 1997, pp. 24, 26.
      

        Schwartz, Nelson, "Pumping Out Profits," 
        
          Fortune,
        
         October 1, 2001, pp. 122–24+.
      

        Shook, Barbara, "Valero Energy to Buy Three Basis Refineries in
        Deal Worth $600 Million," 
        
          Oil Daily,
        
         March 18, 1997, pp. 1+.
      

        "Take That, Oscar Wyatt!," 
        
          Forbes,
        
         August 21, 1978.
      

        "Valero Acquires California Refinery, Outlets," 
        
          Oil and Gas Journal,
        
         March 13, 2000, pp. 28–29.
      

        "Valero Energy: A Newly Independent Pipeliner's Plan to
        Diversify," 
        
          Business Week,
        
         April 7, 1980, pp. 103+.
      

        "Valero Energy Corporation," 
        
          Wall Street Transcript,
        
         October 16, 1989.
      

        "Valero Energy: Gambling on a State-of-the-Art Refinery," 
        
          Business Week,
        
         October 24, 1983, p. 96.
      



        —Elizabeth Rourke
      

        —update: David E. Salamie
      










Also read article about Valero Energy Corporation from Wikipedia

User Contributions:


Comment about this article, ask questions, or add new information about this topic:





Name:



E-mail:



Show my email publicly



Type the code shown:








Public Comment: (50-4000 characters)





 Send comment



 
Valero Energy Corporation Company Profile, Information, Business Description, History, Background Information on Valero Energy Corporation forum




			Utz Quality Foods, Inc.
		

			Value Line, Inc.
		 





















Company Histories













Home
 Company Histories

Company Histories


Company Histories - General Information


Company Histories - 1-Al


Company Histories - Al-Be


Company Histories - Be-C


Company Histories - Ca-Ch


Company Histories - Ci-Da


Company Histories - De-En


Company Histories - En-Ge


Company Histories - Ge-He


Company Histories - He-Ja


Company Histories - Ja-Lo


Company Histories - Lo-Me


Company Histories - Mi-Nu


Company Histories - Oe-Pa


Company Histories - Pa-Ql


Company Histories - Qu-Ro


Company Histories - Ro-Sh


Company Histories - Sh-St


Company Histories - St-Th


Company Histories - Th-Ul


Company Histories - Ul-Vi


Company Histories - Vi-Z

















Valero Energy - Wikipedia






















 






Valero Energy

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Valero Energy Corporation)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Valero Energy Corporation





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: VLO
S&P 500 Component


Industry
Oil and gas


Founded
January 1, 1980; 37 years ago (1980-01-01)


Headquarters
San Antonio, Texas
United States



Area served

North America, Caribbean



Key people

Joseph W. Gorder (CEO) & (President)


Revenue
 US$87.804 billion (2015)[1]



Operating income

 US$6.358 billion (2015)[1]



Net income

 US$3.99 billion (2015)[1]


Total assets
 US$44.343 billion (2015)[1]


Total equity
 US$20.527 billion (2015)[1]



Number of employees

10,103 (2016)[1]


Website
Valero.com






Valero company headquarters in San Antonio, Texas






Valero signage at corporate headquarters



Valero Energy Corporation is a Fortune 500 international manufacturer and marketer of transportation fuels, other petrochemical products, and power. It is headquartered in San Antonio, Texas, United States.[2] The company owns and operates 16 refineries throughout the United States, Canada, United Kingdom, and the Caribbean with a combined throughput capacity of approximately 3 million barrels (480,000 m3) per day, 11 ethanol plants with a combined production capacity of 1.2 billion US gallons (4,500,000 m3) per year, and a 50-megawatt wind farm. Before the 2013 spinoff of CST Brands, Valero was one of the United States' largest retail operators with approximately 6,800 retail and branded wholesale outlets in the United States, Canada, United Kingdom, and the Caribbean under the Valero, Diamond Shamrock, Shamrock, Ultramar, Beacon, and Texaco brands.[3]



Contents


1 History
2 Environmental record
3 Defense contracts
4 Divestitures
5 Acquisitions
6 Retail

6.1 Creation of CST Brands
6.2 Credit cards


7 See also
8 References
9 External links



History[edit]
Valero was created on January 1, 1980,[4] as a spinoff of Coastal States Gas Corporation. At the time, it was the largest corporate spinoff in U.S. history. Valero took over the natural gas operations of the LoVaca Gathering Company, a defunct subsidiary of Coastal States Gas. The name Valero comes from Misión San Antonio de Valero. Valero acquired a small oil refinery in Corpus Christi, Texas in 1981, and began refining operations in 1984.
In 1997, Valero spun off its refinery and retail divisions into a separate company, which kept the Valero name. At the same time, the remaining divisions, which consisted primarily of natural gas operations, were acquired by the Pacific Gas and Electric Company. Later that year, the firm acquired Basis Petroleum, which left it with four refineries in Texas and Louisiana. In 1998, it then acquired a Paulsboro, New Jersey, refinery, the company's first outside of the Gulf Coast area.
In 2000, Valero purchased ExxonMobil's Benicia, California, refinery and interest in 350 Exxon-branded service stations in California, mainly in the San Francisco Bay Area. The company also began retailing gasoline under the Valero brand. In June 2001, Valero acquired the Huntway Refining Company, along with two asphalt plants on the West Coast.




Shamrock gas station, a division of Valero EC


On December 31, 2001, Valero completed its acquisition of Ultramar Diamond Shamrock. The merger left Valero with over 4,700 Ultramar, Diamond Shamrock, and Beacon retail sites in the United States, Canada, and the Caribbean. With this acquisition, Valero also received ownership of Shamrock Logistics L.P., which was renamed Valero L.P. In 2006, the division was spun off as NuStar Energy. Starting in 2002, Valero has expanded its marketing to the East Coast, specifically the Northeast and Florida, using the Valero brand. The acquisition also includes all past Diamond Shamrock assets, including the former Sigmor Petroleum assets founded by Thomas E. Turner, founder of TETCO Inc. (the Sigmor brand name was the initials of Sigfried Moore, Turner's former employer) which merged with Shamrock Oil and Gas in 1960 forming Sigmor Shamrock - which was merged into Diamond Shamrock in 1982. Turner later repurchased Mission Petroleum Carriers when it was acquired by Diamond Shamrock which was the foundation of TETCO,[5] and the business portfolio of the former National Convenience Stores, which was acquired by Diamond Shamrock in November 1995.[6]
On April 25, 2005, Valero agreed to buy Premcor, Inc., for $8 billion in cash and stock to become the largest U.S. refinery, as record prices for gasoline and other fuel boosted profits. On June 30, 2005, Valero announced that it was beginning a two-year process of converting Diamond Shamrock stations to the Valero brand. In the next year, on May 5, 2008, Valero agreed to buy 72 Albertsons gas stations.
Valero laid off 500 employees at its refinery in Delaware City, Delaware on November 20, 2009, due to profitability concerns. It was reported the refinery had lost $1 million per day since the beginning of the year.[citation needed]
On March 11, 2011, Valero announced that it had agreed to a major European purchase from Chevron Corp. for $730 million in cash, not including working capital that will be determined at closing. Estimates on the value of the working capital would place the total price at $1.73 billion. The acquisition includes Chevron's Pembroke Refinery in Wales — one of Europe's largest and most complex — together with marketing and logistical assets throughout the United Kingdom and Ireland, which include 4 pipelines, 11 terminals, an aviation fuel business, about 1,000 retail outlets, inventory and other items. [7] [8] [9]
In 2013, Valero spun off its retail operations into a new publicly traded company, CST Brands.[10] Under long-term supply agreements, Valero continues to supply fuel to over 7,400 retail locations, many of which use brand names formerly owned by Valero.[11]
Environmental record[edit]
The Political Economy Research Institute ranks Valero 28th among corporations that emit airborne pollutants in the United States. The ranking is based on both the quantity (3.4 million pounds in 2005) and the toxicity of the emissions.[12]
Valero was the biggest[13] financial backer of the failed 2010 California Proposition 23 and contributed more than $4 million by August 2010.[14] Had it passed, Proposition 23 would have delayed action on greenhouse-gas emissions in the state of California by delaying current implementation of the California's Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 until the state attained an unemployment rate of 5.5% or less for one full year.[15][16] Critics argued that because that had happened only three times over the last 40 years, the proposition would have had the practical effect of repealing the law.[17][18]
Valero owns two oil refineries in California. The Benicia Refinery is located on the Carquinez Strait, a tributary of the San Francisco Bay.[19] The Wilmington Refinery[20] is located 23 miles (37 km) south from downtown Los Angeles.[21]
Valero's Wilmington (CA), Benicia (CA), and Port Arthur (TX) refineries are known to carry and process crude oil from the Amazon region of South America, a large concern for environmentalists trying to protect the Amazon rainforest. In 2015, Wilmington and Benicia processed about 13,000 barrels of Amazonian crude oil per day, combined.[22]
Defense contracts[edit]
According to Robert Bryce,[23] author and managing editor of Energy Tribune, Valero Energy Corp. has been awarded multiple multimillion-dollar contracts by the U.S. Defense Energy Support Center (DESC) in order to provide fuel to Israel.
Divestitures[edit]
Valero Energy reached an agreement to sell the assets of its terminal operation and discontinue operations in Delaware City to the wholly owned subsidiaries of PBF Energy – Delaware City Refining and Delaware Pipeline – for approximately $220 million in 2010.[24]
Shortly after the divestiture of Delaware City, the company sold its refinery at the Port of Paulsboro to PBF Energy, as well. The sale concluded Valero's refinery ownership on the East Coast.[24]
Acquisitions[edit]
On August 1, 2011, Valero acquired the Pembroke Refinery from Chevron, as well as the marketing and logistics assets, for $730 million, excluding working capital, which was valued at approximately $1 billion. The Pembroke plant is one of the largest and most complex refineries in Western Europe with a total throughput capacity of 270,000 barrels (43,000 m3) per day and a Nelson complexity index rating of 11.8. This puts Valero at a total of 15 refineries and 2.9 million barrels (460,000 m3) per day of throughput capacity overall, solidifying the company’s standing as the world’s largest independent refinery.
Valero also purchased ownership interest in four major pipelines and eleven fuel terminals, a 14,000-barrel (2,200 m3)-per-day aviation fuel business, and a network of more than 1,000 Texaco-branded wholesale sites, which is the largest branded dealer network in the United Kingdom and the second-largest in Ireland. Valero has continued with the Texaco brand in these markets.
Retail[edit]




A typical Valero gas station in Mountain View, California






A Valero Gas Station in Haltom City, Texas on Western Center Blvd that opened in 1986 as Diamond Shamrock, fully converted to Valero in 2005.


Valero retails gasoline branded as Valero, Shamrock, Diamond Shamrock,[25] Ultramar, Beacon, and Total, the last under license from Total S.A.. While this arm of the company was the most visible to the public, it was, according to CEO William R. Klesse, "a very small part of [Valero's] operations".[26]
Valero attempted to shift its focus from being a discount gasoline brand to becoming a premium brand. As part of the shift, Valero began to rebrand its Ultramar, Beacon, Total, and Diamond Shamrock stations to the Valero brand. The Beacon and Shamrock brands are used by retailers as a low-cost alternative to the premium Valero brand. The Shamrock brand is based on the former Shamrock Oil and Gas Company, which merged with Diamond Alkali in 1967 to form Diamond Shamrock, thus declaring the trademark from official abandonment. The name Ultramar, while being eliminated in the United States, continued as Valero's brand name in Canada. Valero introduced its updated "Corner Store" retail concept on December 28, 2007, opening the company's first 5,500-square-foot (510 m2) prototype in western San Antonio. The Corner Store retail division, originally part of Diamond Shamrock, was absorbed into Valero's business portfolio in 2001. Not all Valero gas stations included a Corner Store - one Valero gas station in Euless, Texas east of Fort Worth is co-branded with a 7-Eleven convenience store.
Creation of CST Brands[edit]
On July 31, 2012, during the 2nd Quarter Earnings Conference Call, Valero announced intentions to separate the retail business from the remainder of the company. CFO Mike Ciskowski stated "We believe the separation of our retail business by way of a tax-efficient distribution to our shareholders will create operational flexibility within the business and unlock value for our shareholders." [27] In 2013, Valero completed the spinoff of the retail operations as CST Brands.[10] Valero no longer owns retail operations using the Valero, Diamond Shamrock, Shamrock, Beacon, Ultramar, or Texaco names, but Valero continues to supply fuel.[11]
Credit cards[edit]
Valero issues its own private label credit cards for its stations through its credit card-only subsidiary, DSRM National Bank. The initials stand for "Diamond Shamrock Refining & Marketing", the unit of Diamond Shamrock which created it before being purchased by Valero.[28]
See also[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Valero Energy Corporation.



List of automotive fuel brands
Valero Alamo Bowl
Valero Texas Open

References[edit]


^ a b c d e f "2015 annual results". Valero Energy Corporation. 
^ "Valero". Retrieved 18 March 2011. 
^ "Valero Press Release". Valero. Retrieved 5 June 2012. 
^ "Company history". 
^ "URGENT: 7-Eleven Buying TETCO Retail, Wholesale Operations". WOAI LOCAL NEWS. 14 August 2012. 
^ "Diamond Shamrock buys Stop N Go chain". Houston Chronicle. 9 November 1995. 
^ Polson, Jim (March 11, 2011). "Valero to Buy Chevron’s Pembroke Refinery for $1.73 Billion". Bloomberg. 
^ "Valero confirms purchase of Chevron's Pembroke refinery and other assets". Hydrocarbon Processing. March 11, 2011. 
^ "Valero pays $1.73B for Chevron's Pembroke refinery". Newsgroup: Press Associated Press Check |newsgroup= value (help). March 11, 2011. 
^ a b "Investor Place". Retrieved 23 September 2015. 
^ a b "Company History". valero.com. Retrieved 23 September 2015. 
^ "(PERI) THE TOXIC 100: Top Corporate Air Polluters in the United State". 
^ "California Proposition 23, the Suspension of AB 32 (2010) - Ballotpedia". 
^ Hiltzik, Michael (August 13, 2010). "Proposition 23 - Trying to shed light on a shadowy figure in Proposition 23 battle - Los Angeles Times". Los Angeles Times. 
^ Hiltzik, Michael (July 27, 2010). "Proposition 23 - Oil industry is driving force behind Proposition 23's attack on California's new greenhouse gas regulation - Los Angeles Times". Los Angeles Times. 
^ Roosevelt, Margot (September 10, 2010). "Global Warming - Fight over bid to suspend California's global warming law gets ugly - Los Angeles Times". Los Angeles Times. 
^ Galpern, Dan (2010-07-28). "Vote NO on Proposition 23: The proposition on the November ballot would essentially repeal California's landmark climate-protection law". New Times. Retrieved 2010-09-17. 
^ Teresa Alvardo; Shellye Archambeau (2010-09-09). "Prop 23 is Bad for Business". Fox and Hounds. Retrieved 2010-09-17. 
^ "Benicia". 
^ "Negligence Petroleum storage tank exploded" (PDF). July 2000. 
^ "Wilmington". 
^ "From Well to Wheel: The Social, Environmental, and Climate Costs of Amazon Crude". Amazon Watch. Retrieved 27 March 2017. 
^ "Gaza invasion: Powered by the U.S. - Robert Bryce - Salon.com". 
^ a b "Valero to Sell Paulsboro Oil Refinery to PBF Energy". Bloomberg. 
^ "Diamond Shamrock". The Handbook of Texas Online. Texas State Historical Association (TSHA). 
^ "Valero Energy CEO to Wall St.: You've got us wrong Soapbox - MarketWatch". 
^ Q2 2012 Valero Energy Corp. Earnings Conference Call Transcript of Speaker Notes
^ "DSRM National Bank CRA Performance Evaluation" (PDF). Office of the Comptroller of the Currency. 12 January 2009. 


External links[edit]

Official website



Business data for Valero Energy: Google Finance
Yahoo! Finance
Reuters
SEC filings



Valero Energy Asset Map





 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Valero_Energy&oldid=793490751"					
Categories: Companies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeCompanies established in 1980Oil companies of the United StatesOil pipeline companiesCompanies based in San AntonioAutomotive fuel brandsGas stations in the United States1980 establishments in TexasHidden categories: Pages with URL errorsUse American English from February 2016All Wikipedia articles written in American EnglishUse mdy dates from February 2016Pages using deprecated image syntaxAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from August 2013 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


DeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoPolskiRomânăРусскийSuomiSvenska中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 2 August 2017, at 02:23.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






Valero Energy In Q2: The Growth Continues - Valero Energy Corporation (NYSE:VLO) | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Valero Energy In Q2: The Growth ContinuesAug. 1.17 | About: Valero Energy (VLO) RCK Financial Services Long/short equity, long-term horizon, carmakers, energySummaryValero Energy’s throughput volumes and refining margins grew in the second quarter. Utilization rate was 96%.Improved refined products demand a tailwind in the second half of 2017.Valero provides better yield than peers and has disciplined capital management strategy with a focus on returning value to shareholders.Valero Energy (NYSE:VLO) posted strong results for the second quarter of 2017 beating both EPS and revenue estimates. Excluding the impact of an inventory valuation adjustment in the second quarter of 2016, Valero's EPS grew 15% year over year in the second quarter of 2017. Higher refinery throughput, slightly improved refinery margin, and higher utilization rate drove the earnings growth. 

 Source: Valero Energy reports The refinery throughput increased in 2Q17 as the above graph shows. The throughput margin per barrel for the refining segment rose to $8.66 from $8.59. The refinery utilization rate was 96% compared to 94% in the year-ago quarter. Valero Energy's midstream segment, Valero Energy Partners (NYSE:VLP) too posted growth. Valero started reporting midstream as a separate segment from 1Q17. 

 Source: Valero reports VLP segment's operating income increased compared to 2Q16 based on the company's adjusted numbers for 2Q16 for comparable VLP operations. Valero's midstream operations should provide it some stability in periods when refining margins remain stretched. 


 Source: Valero reports The year-over-year decline in the above graph is attributed to the effect of the inventory valuation adjustment in 2Q16 across Refining and Ethanol segments. The Ethanol segment margins were further pressured due to both higher energy costs and strong ethanol production by the industry. Improved refined products demand There were a couple of important positive developments that Joseph W. Gorder, VLO's Chairman and CEO, discussed during the 2Q17 earnings call (emphasis added): Moving on to the refined products markets, we're pleased to see a rebound in distillate demand, in addition to the strong gasoline pull by domestic and export customers. Downward trends and product inventories and structural shortages in the primary export markets for the U.S. Gulf Coast provide an encouraging backdrop as we move into the second half of the year. On the crude supply side, we're seeing the impact of the OPEC cuts on the medium and heavy sour discounts, but increased U.S. drilling activity and crude production have supported attractive domestic sweet crude discounts relative to Brent in the second quarter. As a result, we switched our refining system to a maximum light crude slate in June. With current market conditions, operating a system with flexibility to process a broad range of feedstocks is very beneficial. Positive movement in distillate and gasoline demand combined with downward trends in product inventories bode well for Valero. The second important point is Valero's ability to process a range of feedstocks, as required by market dynamics. RFS costs Biofuel blending costs was $82 million higher than in the second quarter of 2016. Valero expects this to improve in future. Joseph W. Gorder had to say this on the higher Renewable Identification Numbers or RINs prices: We have been continuing to work this very actively, and really the administration has been very receptive to conversations around this. They are trying to do what's right and to fix broken processes. And so, we remain hopeful that point of obligation is dealt with properly, and we also are hopeful that the EPA uses its authority to adjust the RBOs to be sure that the blend wall doesn't become a chronic problem going forward.
 Attractive yield Valero Energy has a long track record of consistent dividend increases. Its ~4.5% yield is on the higher side compared to peer-average. 

 Source: investor presentation Valero's consistent per share dividend growth is partly attributable to company's share repurchases. In second quarter alone, the company bought back 5.4 million shares for $346 million. This is reflected in the downward trend in the company's outstanding shares over the years in the graph below. 

 Source: Valero reports I think the biggest factor contributing to Valero's consistent dividend growth over the years was its disciplined capital management. The company focuses on maintaining a strong balance sheet. Its capital management strategy is summarized in the below slide: 

 Source: Investor presentation Valero Energy is trading at an LTM PE of 15x. This is lower compared to an average of 22x for Tesoro (NYSE: TSO), Phillips 66 (NYSE: PSX), Marathon Petroleum (NYSE: MPC), and PBF Energy (NYSE: PBF). Valero's relative undervaluation combined with its strong performance for the latest quarter, improving refining fundamentals, attractive yield, and disciplined capital management makes it a stock to buy.

Disclosure: I/we have no positions in any stocks mentioned, and no plans to initiate any positions within the next 72 hours. 
I wrote this article myself, and it expresses my own opinions. I am not receiving compensation for it (other than from Seeking Alpha). I have no business relationship with any company whose stock is mentioned in this article.About this article:ExpandAuthor payment: $35 + $0.01/page view. Authors of PRO articles receive a minimum guaranteed payment of $150-500.Tagged: Basic Materials, Oil & Gas Refining & Marketing, EarningsWant to share your opinion on this article? Add a comment.Disagree with this article? Submit your own.To report a factual error in this article, click hereFollow RCK Financial Services and get email alerts




	
            Valero -
            
            
            Headquarters
            
        

































































































You may be trying to access this site from a secured browser on the server. Please enable scripts and reload this page.










×
                        
                        
                        
                        
                        
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
Close
                        
                        
                        
                        
                        
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    

Warning: System update scheduled for Friday
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
                
                
                
                
                
                
                









Sign In









































It looks like your browser does not have JavaScript enabled. Please turn on JavaScript and try again.



















It looks like your browser does not have JavaScript enabled. Please turn on JavaScript and try again.










About ValeroCurrently selected
Executive TeamBoard of DirectorsVision Statement
Awards & Honors
Company HistoryOfficesRefining SegmentEthanol SegmentVLP SegmentInvestor Relations
Stock Information
Stock Quote & ChartHistorical Price LookupInvestment CalculatorDividendsAnalyst CoverageOwnership Summary
Corporate Governance
Governance HighlightsCommittee Composition
Financial Information
SEC FilingsQuarterly EarningsFinancial ReportsOperations & FundamentalsEarnings EstimatesFinancial Fundamentals
News & Events
News ReleasesEvent CalendarPresentations
Shareholder Services
Investor FAQInformation RequestE-mail AlertsIR Contacts

Corporate Responsibility
CommunitySafety & Environment

Products & Services
Business
ProductsBranded Distributors & Dealers
Getting StartedValero Brand Requirements
Unbranded DistributorsTransportationValero SuppliersInvestment RecoveryMineral Interest Ownership
Consumers
Consumer Credit Cards
Customer SupportTerms & Conditions
Fleet Credit Card Programs
Fleet Credit CardCommercial Credit CardFraud PreventionFrequently Asked QuestionsSample Report
Fuel & Gift CardsTopTierFuelStore Locator

Careers
CorporateRefinery OperationsEthanol OperationsUniversity Recruiting
Programs






























                    
                    
                    Headquarters
                    
                



























Hero Image












Hero Image














Page Content​Valero Energy CorporationOne Valero Way San Antonio, Texas  78249(210) 345-2000
OverviewAfter acquiring Ultramar Diamond Shamrock in 2001, Valero began planning the construction of its state-of-the-art corporate headquarters at the edge of the Texas Hill Country in San Antonio, at Interstate 10 West and Loop 1604. It was completed in 2004. Today, the 200-acre Valero campus includes a main building; two connected newer office buildings; a four-story, separate building; and two large parking facilities. The headquarters also features a beautiful cafeteria, state-of-the-art training facilities, a fitness center, a daycare facility and jogging trails. Valero employees also went to great lengths to protect the environment, saving and relocating hundreds of trees as well as installing a water recycling system to help reduce costs and conserve water. 










































Argus: Valero explores Mexican product supply - Valero Energy Corporation (NYSE:VLO) | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Argus: Valero explores Mexican product supplyJun. 15, 2017  5:52 PM ET|About: Valero Energy Corporation (VLO)|By: Carl Surran, SA News Editor  Valero Energy (NYSE:VLO) has pitched distributing products by rail from Mexico's east coast to central states, Argus reports, citing marketing materials. VLO already is a regular exporter of products to Mexico, but the plans under consideration would push its supply further inland using rail. The VLO materials reportedly outline 950K barrels of gasoline and diesel storage at Altamira, connected to rail facilities and with docking priority at a berth suitable for vessels up to Aframax size, and a Monterrey terminal with 325K barrels of gasoline and diesel storage would receive 100-car unit trains. Now read: Is Valero Energy Undervalued? »From other sitesOil stocks after OPEC keeps production steady  Video  at  CNBC.com (May 30, 2017)These energy stocks have outperformed the S&P 500 when OPEC rolls over policy Video  at  CNBC.com (May 26, 2017)Best stock picks as Trump trades fade Video  at  CNBC.com (Mar 27, 2017)Gartman: Valero will be at advantage over other refiners Video  at  CNBC.com (Jan 30, 2017)Crude on the move: Oil rally ahead? Video  at  CNBC.com (Oct  5, 2016)







Valero Energy Corporation | Business Articles & Essays





























Order papers
Hire writer
Login 














 



Valero Energy Corporation
Strengths are the one component of internal analysis. The component describes any resources and capabilities that support a company to achieve its competitive advantage such as patents, excellent reputation, low cost structure and many more. Concerning the strengths of Valero, I see that the company has maintained continual efforts in developing every single company’s division to have competitive advantage over their rivals. In this situation, I see that the major strength of Valero is the company’s position as the largest refiner in North America with extensive throughput capacity about 3.
3 million barrels per day. In addition, Valero also has distinctive strengths in the number of distribution outlets, which outpaces the company’s rivals. In the company official web site (www. valero. com), the company says that they have become a leader in its respective market with over 5,000 retail sites branded as Ultramar, Valero, Beacon, and Diamond Shamrock in major states in the U. S. , Canada, Latin America and the Caribbean. In addition, other key strengths of Valero that stand the company out of the refineries industries include:

Need essay sample on "Valero Energy Corporation"? We will write a custom essay sample specifically for you for only $13.90/page

Proceed

• Listed as the world’s top refiner in 2005 and 2004 Platts Top 250 Global Energy Company Awards. • Mentioned by IndustryWeek Magazine as one of the World’s 100 Best-Managed Companies. This recognition is because Valero has recorded and maintained excellent performance over years. • Acknowledged as the company who conduct best Points of Light Foundation Excellence in Corporate Community Service Award (one of just nine U. S. companies honored) in 1999. This achievement should strengthen the Valero’s brand equity in consumers’ mind and therefore it is very beneficial to the company’s competitive advantage.
Read full documentThis is because consumers are likely to buy any product or service that is perceived to be high quality. I. 2 Key Weaknesses of Valero The second internal factor in a SWOT analysis is weaknesses. This is simply in contrast to the strengths of a company in which the weaknesses are shown in the absence of specific strength that lead to weaknesses of the company. The weaknesses also include a lack of patent protection, high-cost structure and many more. Concerning the Valero’s weaknesses, I see that the company inability to manage their knowledge skills inventory was one obvious weakness.
The inability to manage the business was drawback to Valero’s business since Valero, as major refiner in the U. S. and in the world, needs to have human resource (HR) that meet the challenge in fast-changing and volatile Valero’s oil refineries business. In this situation, HR division of Valero should understand that corporate labor-supply- chain department is key actor in supplying labor solutions that will include the likes of full-time employees, both US citizens and foreigners. However, in recent months, I notice that Valero has taken appropriate strategy to turn the company’s weakness into company’s strength.
The strategy was to recruit a HR (Human Resource) professional named Dan Hilbert about two years ago. Since the appointment of Hilbert, Valero has conducted some suitable initiatives in their HR department including recruitment strategy, process engineering, and workforce planning, to name a few. I. 3 Core Competencies of Valero and Initiatives to Leverage the Competencies The core competencies of Valero are easily obtained from the company’s products and mission statement since they represent Valero’s current competencies and initiatives that Valero has taken to achieve it.
In the description of Valero’s products, I notice that Valero has wide range of products including the production of premium, environmentally save products such as California Air Resources Board (CARB) Phase II gasoline, low-sulfur diesel, and oxygenates. Based on the range of products that Valero offers I can analyze which product or service that Valero excels its competitors. The analysis takes into account the Valero’s mission statement since it explains the actions Valero does to achieve the company’s goals that are to place their various products in most competitive position in the respective markets.
In the official website of Valero, I notice that the company’s mission statement comes in eight initiatives as shown below : 1. To encourage any acts that increases the safety of our employees and our operations as a core business value. In this first mission statement, Valero clearly defines that safety become their core competence. 2. To produce environmentally clean products in clean facilities; this statement also become competence of any oil companies since they are determined to produce clean products that do not harm our environment.
3. To pursue growth opportunities both domestically and internationally; this statement merely emphasize the financial objectives of Valero and cannot be considered as Valero’s competences since every company aims to achieve it 4. To develop all employees and regard them as our number-one asset; this statement clearly become one of Valero’s core competences. This is because a refiner like Valero needs to respond to the fast-changing oil refineries industry by acquiring and training their employees to keep to with the challenges.
5. To provide a challenging, rewarding environment that facilitates creative thinking, teamwork and opens communications; this is simply a statement that encourages internal elements (employees, managements, and shareholders) to serve the best. 6. To improve customers’ satisfaction by providing reliable and responsive products and services; There are no report providing facts about the comparison of level of satisfaction in oil refineries so that I do not consider this statement as core competence of Valero 7.
To ensure a positive retail experience for consumers by focusing on convenience, value and quality service; this can be considered as one of Valero’s core competences since the company no only deals with oil production and refineries but also oil distribution. In the case of oil distribution, the major need of consumers is to have best quality of gasoline; the statement about this quality of services is important since it describes the Valero’s initiatives in delivering best quality of gasoline in their over 5,000 distribution outlets. 8.
To take a leadership role in our communities by encouraging employees’ involvement; this is not a statement of Valero’s core competences. In fact, it reveals Valero’s commitment to serve communities as part of its Corporate Social Responsibility (CSR) program. Concerning the Valero’s competence to develop all employees and regard them as our number-one asset, (the fourth number in the above list); I notice that Valero has carried out appropriate strategy to achieve it. One of them is through the appointment of new Manager of Employment Service named Dan Hilbert.
Hilbert’s arrival in Valero has significantly helped the company to improve and maintain its core competences since previously knowledge skills inventory became a weakness of Valero. Some initiatives that support Valero’s competence in human resources include acquisition of talents in oil industry, process engineering, and appropriate planning in workforce. Forman, (2006) says that those initiatives are proven beneficial for Valero since it helps Valero to grow into a great company by conducting proper transformation in Valero’s staffing organization. I.
4 Generic Competitive Strategy Pursued by Valero Discussing Valeros’ competitive strategy should address what the market needs. Current market situation in oil refinery industry is very challenging since the rising in the oil price will lead to negative impacts on a country’s economy, in general, and decrease company’s profits since customers must not accept the increase of gasoline price. The rise of oil prices has increased industrial costs. As a refiner, Valero needs to consider the impact of oil price rising since Valero cannot change their gasoline price many times.
However, the decision to keep the market price of gasoline in steady state might lead to the decrease of Valero’s profit margin. Concerning the issue, I notice that the generic competitive strategy that Valero pursues is by carrying out a series of mergers and acquisition (M&A) or in other terms Valero do proper vertical integration. By definition, vertical integration is the practice to integrate various parts of business, upstream and downstream, in order to increase the effectiveness of a company.
For example, an oil company that deals with the exploration of crude oil might decide to do vertical integration by doing merger and acquisition with a refineries and distribution network companies. The reason of conducting these initiatives is they give Valero possibility to control oil price and reduce supplier power that can increase the gasoline price based on the market condition. Therefore, by building a company that operates the oil exploration to gasoline distribution, Valero gains advantages of delivering competitive pricing scheme.
In his historical journey, I notice that Valero has evolved from a gas exploration company into a comprehensive energy company that does not only deal with the exploration but also the refineries and distribution of energy. Below are some mergers and acquisitions that mark the development of Valero into an energy company: • In 1981, Valero commenced its first vertical integration initiative through the expansion into energy sector. The expansion was carried out by acquiring a small crude refining operation in Corpus Christi, Texas.
In order to speed up the production, at that time, Valero decided to spend over $1 billion to develop the state-of-the-art refining unit in the U. S. • In 1998, the acquisition of Mobil’s Paulsboro; the process to achieve the vertical integration objectives of Valero also happened in 1998 when the company decided to acquire Mobil’s Paulsboro refinery. By completing the important acquisition, Valero became the U. S. second largest independent refiner with a total production about 735,000 BPD.
• In 2000, the acquisition of ExxonMobil Corporation; the vertical integration process continues in 2000 when Valero acquired ExxonMobil Corporation’s Benicia, California. The acquisition gave Valero with additional 270-store retail distribution chain and 80 company-operated retail sites. This acquisition is the example of the integration that enriches the process of the company’s sales and distribution network. • In June 2001, the acquisition of Corpus Christi refinery; moreover, in June 2001, Valero also committed to buy a refinery in Corpus Christi, previously owned by subsidiaries of El Paso Corporation.
• In Dec 31, 2001, the acquisition of San Antonio-based Ultramar Diamond Shamrock Corporation; late 2001 became the historical date for Valero as the company completed its largest transaction by doing a merger with San Antonio-based Ultramar Diamond Shamrock Corporation. The ‘married’ company greatly adds Valero strengths as a company that grows through a series of vertical integration since Valero became one of the nation’s top three refining and marketing companies at that time. I.
5 Valero’s Competencies and the Pursue of the Generic Competitive Strategy As mentioned at previous section, I notice that the generic competitive strategy that Valero is the initiatives to carry out a series of mergers and acquisition (M&A) or in other terms Valero do accurate vertical integration process in order to become the best energy company in the U. S. and in the world. To pursue this generic competitive strategy, I notice that the company’s four competencies are in line with the chase of the competitive strategy.
For example, Valero’s competencies to provide safety-working environments to their employees are advantageous when Valero acquires a company and set the same rules. In addition, Valero’s competency in producing environmentally clean products in clean facilities is also supportive to the achievement of Valero’s competitive strategy. This is because to become the most preferred gasoline retailers, Valero needs to produce clean products that do not harm environment. Moreover, Valero’s competency in developing all employees’ skills also complies with this statement clearly become one of Valero’s core competences.
This is because a refiner like Valero needs to respond to the fast-changing oil refineries industry by acquiring and training their employees to keep to with the challenges. Imagine, if Valero has unmatched labor skills because of acquisition over other companies, it could hurt Valero I the long term since there is no standard requirement for their employees. In compliance with the generic competitive strategy to be the best energy company, Valero also strengthen its competency to ensure a positive retail experience for consumers by focusing on convenience, value and quality service.
The competencies that Valero has and the competitive strategy that Valero attains have put the company to be one of oil refiner that listed in Fortune 15 Company and becomes a company that has the largest number of refineries in North America, filling stations nationwide and 22,000 employees. Part 2: External Analysis II. 1 Valero’s key opportunities The first external factor in SWOT analysis is Opportunities. These elements provide specific opportunities that may help a company to gain more profit and achieve sustainable growth.
They include unfulfilled customer need, new technologies, elimination of trade barriers and so on. Concerning the Valero’s opportunities, I see that market needs for high-quality-refined oil at affordable price becomes the key opportunities for Valero. This is due to Valero has facilities from oil exploration to distribution. Therefore, it has ability to control costs while its retailer competitors will hardly have similar condition since they depend on the price from refiners that account for 15% of total retail price. Figure 1 shows the cost to produce a gallon of oil in 2003 and 2004.
Figure 1 Composition of Oil Retail Price Source: Energy Information Administration. (2006). A Primer on Gasoline Prices Another opportunity is the fact that current technology can only afford to produce about 47 barrels of gasoline from every 100 barrels of crude oil. It means that, Valero could research some way to increase the efficiency of oil production so that they will have greater margin when the retail price is high and have no loss when the price is low. II. 2 Valero’s key threats In addition, Threats describe any changes in the external factors that may put any company in unsafe position in the market.
They include a change in consumer tastes, new substitute products, new regulations and many more. In Valero case, I notice that the main threat is the volatility of crude oil price. As shown in the figure 1, the price of crude oil accounts for 44% of total retail price in 2003. Therefore, the increase in oil price still becomes critical and major problems of world economy and for an energy company like Valero it could be a disaster since sometime they make profit but in other time, they loose money. Its negative impacts seem to be the factors that haunt either industrialized countries or the developed ones.
Another threat for Valero is the natural disaster like Hurricane Katrina. Such disaster is potential to destroy Valero’s major oil pipelines that will result in the higher costs to deliver oil to refineries. II. 3 Valero and Environmental Opportunities and Threats The demand for producing environmental-friendly gasoline becomes great opportunities for Valero. Its series of acquisition over refineries in the United States gives benefits for Valero since they are able to find the best method to produce the demanded gasoline as affordable price.
However, the situation could be potential threat since in some states like California; it is needed to produce reformulated gasoline to sell to customers in urban areas where the cost of production of such gasoline is much higher than that of regular gasoline. In addition, refiners also face some restriction in some states in which in the 25 states, there are prohibition to use gasoline additive MTBE since the additive is found to be responsible of groundwater contamination.
For this reason, Federal Bureau of Land Management is to issue environmental impact statement so that refiners like Valero have the certainty whether to use oxygenated like MTBE. II. 4 Porter’s Five Forces of Valero At the heart of this analysis is the industry analyzing model known as Porter’s five forces model which details the threat of new entrants, power of buyers, power of suppliers, rivalry among existing competitors, and the threat of substitute products for energy industry that satisfies following diagram: Figure 2 Porter’s Diagram of Five Forces
a) Degree of Rivalry Rivalry in energy industry is intense as there are about 168,000 outlets across the United States; each of them might offer customers with high-quality gasoline in much competitive price. Therefore, a refiner and distributor of gasoline that could not fulfill this market requirement will be set aside from the competition. Figure 3 shows the various pricing of gasoline in some states in the U. S. The figure suggests that refiners and distributors like Valero should keep up with the average market price by keeping their costs below the price.
Figure 3 Motor Gasoline Prices at Retail Outlets, 2004 (dollars per gallon, including taxes) Source: Energy Information Administration. (2006). A Primer on Gasoline Prices b) New Entrants The threat of new entrants rises as the barrier to entry is reduced in a marketplace. As more firms enter a market, we will see rivalry increase, and profitability will fall (theoretically) to the point where there is no incentive for new firms to enter the industry.
One of common barriers to enter an industry is brand loyalty. In case of Valero, I notice that the threat of new entrants is quite low since within the past 29 years, there are no new refineries due to state restriction for fear of damaging impact on environment. However, this situation could be overcome immediately if Federal Bureau of Land Management is finished to report about refinery’s impact on underground water sources and endangered species.



Related
essay
samples




                    Energy Crisis                

                    Gas prices have become uncontrollable and though it is not directly the cause of the United States (US) economic recession, data indicates the increas...                

View
 Essay




                    Overpopulation and Energy Consumption                

                    As the price of energy continue to climb to all-time high records, the general public has failed to notice that it is the rapid rate of population gro...                

View
 Essay




                    Memorandum audience                

                    Valero Energy Corporation Memorandum To       :        Professor Lawrence Clark From  : Date   :        August 6, 2016 Re   ...                

View
 Essay




                    Monster Energy                

                    Monster Energy was introduced in the market in the year 2002 by Hansen Natural Corporation. It is manufactured by Monster Beverage Company of Corona, ...                

View
 Essay




                    Exxon Mobil Corporation                

                    ExxonMobil is one of the leading oil and gas producers and suppliers in the world today. Exxon Mobil Corporation is dedicated to maintaining its posit...                

View
 Essay




                    American Energy Market                

                    There are so many problems that affect the American energy market. These include; crude oil prices, disruption of supply, low inventories relative to ...                

View
 Essay




                    Energy costs in businesses and homesteads                

                    Energy conservation is quite important in mitigating exhaustion of natural resources in the community. This is due to the fact that most of the energy...                

View
 Essay




                    Accounting Audit Intel Corporation                

                    It is important to note that Intel was a company founded on the risk/reward principle and still firmly believes in it today. In order to accurately an...                

View
 Essay




                    Economics and Expensive Energy Provider                

                    1. Should energy be subsidized by government? The Philippines is now the most expensive energy provider in Asia. This means that our electricity, natu...                

View
 Essay




                    Green Energy Technology Business                

                    Green energy technology business refers to the use of environmentally friendly or non-polluting technologies to produce clean sources of energy for th...                

View
 Essay



 
‹ Previous Post Marketing products
Next post › Venture  Capital  And  Financing  Innovation





You
may
like



 

                This Is How You Write Headlines That Hook ’em!            
The headline is the most important part of your sales letter or space ad. You could have the best advertising copy and the best product, but it doesn’t matter if the reader doesn't get past the headline. Changing the headline can make a huge difference in your response rate, even if you don't change one word in …


View
 Essay




 

                Microsoft and Facebook Are Laying an Internet Cable Across the Atlantic — Start Up Your Day Roundup            
Looking for the latest headlines in small business, innovation and tech? Our recaps are posted every morning to keep you current. In the clear. A jury ruled Google  by using Oracle software in its Android devices. Need essay sample on “Microsoft and Facebook Are Laying an Internet Cable Across the Atlantic — Start Up Your Day Roundup”? …


View
 Essay




 

                Write Better Ad Copy with This 1 Rule            
One of the best, most succinct rules for writing ad copy that works is to “sell the sizzle, not the steak.” The heart of any successful direct mail campaign is the sales piece. That’s where it all starts. Related:  Need essay sample on “Write Better Ad Copy with This 1 Rule”? We will write a custom essay …


View
 Essay




 

                4 Ways to Dramatically Increase Email Subscriptions            
Attention small business owners: Email marketing is not dead. Email marketing is alive and well and continues to blow the doors off of other digital marketing channels. In fact, according to digital marketer and blogger Abrar Mohi Shafee writing on the the , “Your email is your biggest asset!” But how can that be with …


View
 Essay


 

Most
popular
topics

Accounting
Analysis
Bank
Business
Communication
Companies
Company
Consumer
Corporate
Corporation
Customer
Development
E-commerce
Economic
Economics
Economy
Employee
Employees
Employment
Environment
Ethics
Finance
Financial
Globalization
Government
Industry
Leadership
Management
Manager
Market
Marketing
Motivation
Organization
Organizational
Organizations
Planning
Product
Project
Strategic
Strategies
Strategy
Technology
Trade
Wal-Mart
Workplace 




Can’t wait to take that assignment burden offyour shoulders?
Let us know what it is and we will show you how it can be done!




Essay (Any Type)
Article (Any Type)
Assignment
Content (Any Type)
Admission Essay
Annotated Bibliography
Argumentative Essay
Article Review
Book/Movie Review
Business Plan
Capstone Project
Case Study
Coursework
Creative Writing
Critical Thinking
Dissertation
Dissertation chapter
Lab Report
Math Problem
Research Paper
Research Proposal
Research Summary
Scholarship Essay
Speech
Statistic Project
Term Paper
Thesis
Other
Presentation or Speech
Q&A







×
Sorry, but copying text is forbidden on this website. If you need this or any other sample, please register

Signup & Access Essays
Already on Businessays? Login here

No, thanks. I prefer suffering on my own

Sorry, but copying text is forbidden on this website. If you need this or any other sample register now and get a free access to all papers, carefully proofread and edited by our experts.
Sign in / Sign up
No, thanks. I prefer suffering on my own







Sign in



Email



Password








Sign up



Email




 - or - 



Sign up with Facebook













Not quite the topic you need?
We would be happy to write itJoin and witness the magic

Service Open At All Times
|
Complete Buyer Protection
|
Plagiarism-Free Writing








Emily from Businessays
Hi there, would you like to get such a paper? How about receiving a customized one? Check it out
            https://goo.gl/chNgQy

















Basic Materials and Energy Stocks | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Basic Materials and Energy StocksEclipse Resources 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesECR• Today, 10:23 AM • SA TranscriptsHi-Crush Partners LP 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesHCLP• Today, 10:22 AM • SA TranscriptsIngevity Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesNGVT• Today, 10:18 AM • SA TranscriptsTransocean: Does Performance Still Matter?RIG• Today, 10:00 AM • D.M. Martins Research•4 CommentsTeekay LNG Partners L.P. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesTGP• Today, 9:55 AM • SA TranscriptsAir Products & Chemicals: Excellent Stock Choice Even Near A 52-Week HighAPD• Today, 9:44 AM • Cash-Centered CreepService Cost Margins Poised To ReboundHAL, SLB• Today, 9:36 AM • BTU AnalyticsEP Energy Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesEPE• Today, 9:27 AM • SA TranscriptsBreaking Down Icahn And CVR Refining's Big ShortEditors' Pick • CVRR• Today, 9:24 AM • Tristan R. BrownGCP Applied Technologies Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesGCP• Today, 9:21 AM • SA TranscriptsDevon Energy Can Manage A Low Price WorldDVN• Today, 9:19 AM • Callum TurcanKinross Gold Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesKGC• Today, 9:16 AM • SA TranscriptsMarathon Oil Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesMRO• Today, 9:13 AM • SA Transcripts•2 CommentsSpectra Energy Partners, LP 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSEP• Today, 9:06 AM • SA TranscriptsShell Midstream Partners, LP 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSHLX• Today, 9:05 AM • SA TranscriptsParkland Fuel Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesPKIUF• Today, 8:39 AM • SA TranscriptsMammoth Energy Services 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesTUSK• Today, 8:24 AM • SA TranscriptsTrinseo S.A. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesTSE• Today, 8:21 AM • SA TranscriptsPioneer Natural Resources' Stock Valuation Is Too HighPXD• Today, 8:21 AM • HiddenValueInvestor•4 CommentsEldorado Gold - 2nd Quarter Results... How Low Can It Go?EGO• Today, 8:03 AM • Fun Trading•8 CommentsRandgold Resources Limited 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesGOLD• Today, 6:57 AM • SA TranscriptsDaily Insider Ratings Round Up 8/1/17: IFF, RETA, TDCIFF• Today, 6:22 AM • InsiderInsightsHeadwinds Remain For National OilwellNOV• Today, 5:33 AM • Shock Exchange•3 CommentsAshland Inc. 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesASH• Today, 4:39 AM • SA TranscriptsCabot Corporation 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCBT• Today, 12:36 AM • SA TranscriptsTitanium Corp.: A Rapidly Approaching Deadline Will Give Greater Clarity On Its Significant Upside PotentialTITUF• Yesterday, 11:40 PM • Dan StringerReviewing BP After 6 Months Of OPEC Supply CutsBP• Yesterday, 6:47 PM • Callum Turcan•7 CommentsExxon Mobil Or Chevron: Which Is The Better Buy Here?XOM, CVX• Yesterday, 6:45 PM • Peter F. Way, CFA•20 CommentsCentury Aluminum Company 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCENX• Yesterday, 6:37 PM • SA TranscriptsTransocean Writes Down $1.7 BillionRIG• Yesterday, 6:34 PM • Vladimir Zernov•36 CommentsWhy BP Is The Best Oil Major StockBP• Yesterday, 6:23 PM • Josh Arnold•16 CommentsDiamond Offshore Drilling: Merger? Not NowDO• Yesterday, 6:20 PM • Vladimir Zernov•18 CommentsChesapeake Energy - The Bears Don't Seem To Be Going Away Anytime SoonCHK• Yesterday, 6:15 PM • Aisha Rahman•44 CommentsTC PipeLines, LP 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesTCP• Yesterday, 4:36 PM • SA TranscriptsNewfield Exploration Co. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesNFX• Yesterday, 4:02 PM • SA TranscriptsChevron: Still The Worst Stock In The DowCVX• Yesterday, 3:56 PM • Robert Riesen•11 CommentsThird-Quarter Results Underpin Future Growth At Comstock MiningLODE• Yesterday, 3:44 PM • Jesse Donovan•7 CommentsWhy I Took A Position In Chesapeake Before EarningsCHK• Yesterday, 3:04 PM • Giovanni DiMauro•39 CommentsEnLink Midstream Partners, LP 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesENLK• Yesterday, 2:41 PM • SA TranscriptsFreeport-McMoRan: Copper Price PlayFCX• Yesterday, 2:15 PM • Kush Patel•10 CommentsTrek Mining (LWLCF) Aurizona Gold Mine Feasibility Study Results - SlideshowLWLCF• Yesterday, 1:55 PM • SA TranscriptsPhillips 66 Increases Buybacks And Reduces Capex GuidancePSX• Yesterday, 1:46 PM • Michael Fitzsimmons•17 CommentsThis Stock Market Rotation Has Some Energy Behind ItXLE• Yesterday, 1:26 PM • 360 Investment ResearchThe Vanadium Bull And One Vanadium Stock That Few Talk AboutPRPCF• Yesterday, 12:10 PM • John Lee, CFA•1 CommentVanEck Vector Junior Gold Miners New Portfolio Great Way To Diversify Into Precious MetalsGDXJ• Yesterday, 11:15 AM • Holmes Osborne•10 CommentsChevron: Nice Yield, But Not My FavoriteCVX• Yesterday, 10:45 AM • Jonathan Weber•8 CommentsAbraxas Petroleum: Wolfcamp Economics Comparable To Middle BakkenAXAS• Yesterday, 10:28 AM • Elephant Analytics•1 CommentNorthern Dynasty Minerals: Enough With The Bearish PropagandaEditors' Pick • NAK• Yesterday, 9:03 AM • Joshua Bartlett•26 CommentsIvanhoe Mines: The Platreef mine DFS results are positiveIVPAF• Yesterday, 8:50 AM • Peter Arendas•10 CommentsKorea's Steel Sector is a StealPKX• Yesterday, 8:13 AM • Hyundai Motor Investment & Securities•1 CommentThe Upside Of MLP Distribution CutsEditors' Pick • AMLP• Yesterday, 7:43 AM • Alerian•28 CommentsTerraVia Files For Chapter 11 And Enters Into A Competitive Bidding ProcessTVIA• Yesterday, 5:57 AM • Kevin Quon•64 CommentsLundin Petroleum AB 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesLNDNF• Yesterday, 3:26 AM • SA TranscriptsDiamond Offshore - 2nd Quarter 2017 And Fleet Status. Time To Merge?DO• Yesterday, 2:22 AM • Fun Trading•47 CommentsChevron Is Defying ExpectationsCVX• Tue, Aug. 1, 7:35 PM • Sarfaraz A. Khan•5 CommentsValero Energy In Q2: The Growth ContinuesVLO• Tue, Aug. 1, 7:32 PM • RCK Financial Services•5 CommentsChevron: This Bear Is Throwing In The TowelCVX• Tue, Aug. 1, 7:25 PM • Josh Arnold•9 CommentsConocoPhillips: Capped Upside For NowCOP• Tue, Aug. 1, 7:05 PM • Stone Fox Capital•6 CommentsStatoil: Good Q2 Results And A Low Carbon Future EmergingSTO• Tue, Aug. 1, 6:56 PM • Keith Williams•31 CommentsFuchs Petrolub SE 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesFUPEF• Tue, Aug. 1, 6:53 PM • SA TranscriptsAlacer Gold Corp. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesALIAF• Tue, Aug. 1, 6:49 PM • SA TranscriptsThe Herd Has Abandoned Exxon MobilXOM• Tue, Aug. 1, 6:35 PM • Josh Arnold•42 CommentsPeabody Energy Corp. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesBTU• Tue, Aug. 1, 5:44 PM • SA TranscriptsSyngenta Invests In Agricultural Data Firm Premier Crop SystemsSYT• Tue, Aug. 1, 4:51 PM • Donovan Jones•1 CommentPhillips 66 Partners LP 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesPSXP• Tue, Aug. 1, 4:32 PM • SA TranscriptsEnsco Defends Atwood MergerATW, ESV• Tue, Aug. 1, 4:25 PM • Vladimir Zernov•20 CommentsQEP Resources: Questionable Acquisition And Something More ConcerningQEP• Tue, Aug. 1, 2:16 PM • Coherencia Trader•1 CommentPenn Virginia (PVAC) Acquires Eagle Ford Assets From Devon Energy (DVN)DVN• Tue, Aug. 1, 1:58 PM • SA Transcripts•1 CommentDundee Precious Metals Acquires Terrative Digital SolutionsDPMLF• Tue, Aug. 1, 1:57 PM • SA TranscriptsTotal: An Oil Major That Gushes High DividendsTOT• Tue, Aug. 1, 1:47 PM • Cash-Centered Creep•18 CommentsScotts Miracle-Gro: Long-Term RealitySMG• Tue, Aug. 1, 1:44 PM • Quad 7 Capital•1 CommentGreen Plains Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesGPRE• Tue, Aug. 1, 1:38 PM • SA TranscriptsExxon Asks: Is Guyana A 10 Billion Barrel Play?XOM• Tue, Aug. 1, 12:00 PM • Callum Turcan•21 CommentsExxon Mobil - A Steward Of Capital, ResourcesXOM• Tue, Aug. 1, 11:58 AM • Dividend Stream•8 CommentsGrowth Returns To Chevron's Upstream DivisionCVX• Tue, Aug. 1, 11:56 AM • Callum Turcan•3 Comments123456...713Next Page


Valero to Buy Murphy RefineryHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreYahooSearchSearchSkip to NavigationSkip to Main ContentSkip to Related Content0Valero to Buy Murphy RefineryZacks Equity ResearchZacksSeptember 2, 2011ReblogShareTweetShareValero Energy Corp. (NYSE: VLO - News) has reached an agreement with Murphy Oil Corp. (NYSE: MUR - News) to acquire its final refinery in the U.S. Post acquisition, the U.S. independent refiner will widen its footprint in the U.S. Gulf region.Per the agreement, Valero will pay $325 million for Murphy’s refinery in Meraux, Louisiana. The deal also includes the purchase of associated logistics and inventory for approximately $300 million, subject to the closing adjustments.Apart from the refinery, the purchase price includes an adjacent product terminal, a 20% equity interest in the Collins Product Pipeline and T&M terminal, and a 3.2% interest in the Louisiana Offshore Oil Port.The 135,000-barrels per day (bpd) Meraux refinery comprises of a 34,000 bpd hydrocracker and significant hydro processing capacity, which helps it to process medium sour crude and produce significant yields of premium products. The deal is expected to be accretive to Valero as it will add the sixth Gulf Coast refinery to its portfolio, thereby boosting the capability to serve markets in Latin America, South America and Europe.Valero aims to finance the transaction with available cash and complete it in the fourth quarter, subject to customary closing conditions and regulatory approval. It also intends to integrate the Meraux refinery east of New Orleans with its 205,000 bpd St. Charles refinery in Norco, Louisiana, west of New Orleans.San Antonio, Texas-based Valero Energy Corporation is the largest independent refiner and marketer of petroleum products in the U.S., with a refining capacity of 2.6 million barrels per day in its 14 refineries located throughout the U.S., Canada and the Caribbean. Valero is also a leading ethanol producer with 10 ethanol plants in the Midwest with a combined capacity of 1.1 billion gallons per year.Following the completion on the purchase of Chevron Corp.’s (NYSE: CVX - News) Pembroke refinery in Wales, U.K., the latest deal marks a significant step for Valero in diversifying its portfolio. The Pembroke refinery gives Valero greater flexibility in chasing margins by transporting products between the U.S. and U.K. We expect Valero’s 2011 earnings to benefit from improving U.S. and global economies, higher refining margins, wider crude discounts, increased operating rates and continued cost saving initiatives.Valero holds a Zacks #2 Rank, which translates into a Buy rating for a period of one to three months. We are also maintaining our long-term Outperform recommendation on the stock.VALERO ENERGY CORP NEW (VLO): Read the Full Research ReportMURPHY OIL CORP (MUR): Read the Full Research ReportCHEVRON CORP NEW (CVX): Read the Full Research ReportZacks Investment ResearchReblogShareTweetSharePopular in the CommunityThe Obamas Send Newlywed Couple a Moving Note of Congratulations7,468 reactions6%67%27%Start Living The Millionaire LifestyleTorOptionSponsoredFire breaks out at world's largest fish market in Tokyo39 reactions2%93%5%Trump, frustrated by Afghan war, suggests firing U.S. commander: officials6,598 reactions4%72%24%63,000 people have canceled their Tesla Model 3 orders576 reactions3%79%18%Elephant Parade hits the streets of São Paulo23 reactions4%76%20%Huckabee Sanders takes a dig at Sen. Flake over anti-Trump book275 reactions6%62%32%Luis Fonsi On Justin Bieber's Spanish, 'Despacito' Hitting No. 1569 reactions3%80%17%Trump set to embark on 1st vacation since inauguration3,035 reactions4%75%21%Game of Thrones's Sophie Turner: 'I got a job over a better actress because I had more followers'141 reactions5%78%17%Death of Texas woman found buried on Maryland beach ruled accidental904 reactions4%73%23%Training with America's militias81 reactions3%74%23%'The Briefing Room': Legal immigration reform10 reactions11%67%22%Historic Pearl River Mart Reopens to Bring 'Cross-Cultural Joy' to NYC225 reactions8%70%22%Dave Chappelle Says Donald Trump Is Like a ‘Bad DJ at a Good Party’486 reactions4%71%25%Violence on ‘Big Brother’: Contestants Forced to Opposite Ends of the House190 reactions4%67%29%Dave Chappelle Says Donald Trump Is Like a ‘Bad DJ at a Good Party’Swamp Fox: DJ doubled my retirement account.Join the Conversation1 / 5486










	
            Valero -
            
            
            Home
            
        






























































































You may be trying to access this site from a secured browser on the server. Please enable scripts and reload this page.










×
                        
                        
                        
                        
                        
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
Close
                        
                        
                        
                        
                        
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    

Warning: System update scheduled for Friday
                    
                    
                    
                    
                    
                
                
                
                
                
                
                









Sign In









































It looks like your browser does not have JavaScript enabled. Please turn on JavaScript and try again.



















It looks like your browser does not have JavaScript enabled. Please turn on JavaScript and try again.










About Valero
Executive TeamBoard of DirectorsVision Statement
Awards & Honors
Company HistoryOfficesRefining SegmentEthanol SegmentVLP SegmentInvestor Relations
Stock Information
Stock Quote & ChartHistorical Price LookupInvestment CalculatorDividendsAnalyst CoverageOwnership Summary
Corporate Governance
Governance HighlightsCommittee Composition
Financial Information
SEC FilingsQuarterly EarningsFinancial ReportsOperations & FundamentalsEarnings EstimatesFinancial Fundamentals
News & Events
News ReleasesEvent CalendarPresentations
Shareholder Services
Investor FAQInformation RequestE-mail AlertsIR Contacts

Corporate Responsibility
CommunitySafety & Environment

Products & Services
Business
ProductsBranded Distributors & Dealers
Getting StartedValero Brand Requirements
Unbranded DistributorsTransportationValero SuppliersInvestment RecoveryMineral Interest Ownership
Consumers
Consumer Credit Cards
Customer SupportTerms & Conditions
Fleet Credit Card Programs
Fleet Credit CardCommercial Credit CardFraud PreventionFrequently Asked QuestionsSample Report
Fuel & Gift CardsTopTierFuelStore Locator

Careers
CorporateRefinery OperationsEthanol OperationsUniversity Recruiting
Programs




































StakeholdersOur stakeholders are our partners to whom we pledge to deliver operational excellence, disciplined management of capital and long-term value.MoreEmployeesWe consider our employees a competitive advantage and our greatest asset.MoreSafetySafety is our foundation for success.MoreCommunitiesWe share our success with the communities where we live and work through volunteerism, charitable giving and economic support.MoreEnvironmentWe produce environmentally clean products and are committed stewards of the environment.MorePrevNext















Attachment 6 Image







NYSE: VLOQuote data delayed at least 15 minutes$63.93 1.63





Investor Relations







Attachment 4 Image


Credit Cards and Gift Cards






Attachment 5 Image


Find a Store Location Near You









                                
                                
                                About Valero
                                
                            

Attachment 1 Image


                                
                                
                                Valero is the world's largest independent petroleum refiner, and a leading marketer, ethanol producer and corporate citizen.
                                
                            



                                
                                
                                Products & Services
                                
                            

Attachment 2 Image


                                
                                
                                Valero's consumer and business products and services provide convenience, value and opportunity.
                                
                            



                                
                                
                                Careers
                                
                            

Attachment 3 Image


                                
                                
                                Valero provides a challenging, enjoyable and rewarding work environment.
                                
                            









































